Hawaii, session 2026, SB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the cancer research center of Hawaii reduces the burden of cancer through research, education, patient care, and community outreach.  The cancer research center of Hawaii is the only National Cancer Institute (NCI)-designated cancer center in Hawaii and the Pacific region.  Furthermore, it is a member of the Hawaii Cancer Consortium along with five hospital groups and the university of Hawaii's John A. Burns school of medicine (JABSOM). JABSOM educates and trains health care professionals, including physicians, biomedical scientists, and allied health workers. JABSOM also conducts fundamental medical research and translates discoveries into delivery practices. Because JABSOM is a community-based medical school without its own university hospital, it partners with private hospitals in the community to achieve its educational mission. The public funds and other resources the State has made available to JABSOM and the cancer research center of Hawaii have been substantial.  The magnitude of state funds and other resources provided to the university of Hawaii, the distinction of the university being the sole public institution of higher education in the State, and the cancer research center of Hawaii being the only NCI-designated cancer center in Hawaii underscore the importance of establishing complementary strategic priorities and coordinating the management and deployment of state resources appropriated to JABSOM and the cancer research center of Hawaii. It is in the public's interest that state resources be efficiently and effectively managed to optimize the public benefits. Just as co-locating the physical facilities for JABSOM and the cancer research center of Hawaii on adjoining sites in Kakaako promotes synergistic efforts, the legislature determines that it is a statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution, to ensure that the management of public resources provided to JABSOM and the cancer research center of Hawaii be integrated, coordinated, and focused on common priorities to avoid unnecessary duplication of administrative expenses or conflicting priorities. The legislature further finds that as a matter of statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution, the cancer research center of Hawaii should be an organized research unit under the administrative and management purview of JABSOM.  The legislature notes that the cancer research center of Hawaii and JABSOM share many resources, including the health science library, fitness facility, telecommunications system, and on-site security personnel.  Merging the cancer research center of Hawaii and JABSOM will eliminate redundancies in building construction, equipment expenses, facilities operating expenses, and common staff positions, which will reduce costs.  Furthermore, a merger would streamline future strategic collaborations, foster enhanced cooperation, and create new opportunities for joint initiatives in medical research, education, and patient care. Placing resources devoted to training and educating physicians and conducting cancer research in an integrated university organizational structure as opposed to stand-alone and duplicative organizations will foster a uniform strategic vision.  Unified leadership will also allow better coordination with the university of Hawaii's private partners in the hospital community and with other state agencies. The legislature also notes that from 2014 to 2016, the university of Hawaii developed business plans, hired consultants, and made presentations to its board of regents on the university's plans to integrate the university of Hawaii Kakaako health science campus and eliminate operational redundancies between JABSOM and the cancer research center of Hawaii.  Further, the university of Hawaii frequently groups different organized research units within a larger administrative structure.  For example, the school of ocean and earth science and technology encompasses several outstanding research units, including the center for microbial oceanography: research and education and Hawaii institute of marine biology. To maintain the NCI designation as a cancer center consistent with NCI guidelines, the director of the cancer research center of Hawaii shall continue to have a direct line of reporting and accountability to the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Manoa and the provost of the university of Hawaii at Manoa shall also have a reporting line to the dean of JABSOM. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require: (1)  The cancer research center of Hawaii to be reestablished in statute as an organized research unit within JABSOM; (2)  The director of the cancer research center of Hawaii to be appointed by the university of Hawaii's board of regents upon recommendation from the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Manoa and the provost of the University of Hawaii at Manoa instead of the dean of JABSOM; (3)  The director of the cancer research center of Hawaii to report to the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, the provost of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, and the dean of the school of medicine and coordinate with the president of the university; and (4)  Funds expended from or originating from the research and training revolving fund established by section 304A-2253, Hawaii Revised Statues, for JABSOM or the cancer research center of Hawaii to be used for research and research-related purposes only. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, part IV, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "     .  Cancer Research Center of Hawaii §304A-    Cancer research unit.  (a) There is established within the medical school of the university of Hawaii an organized research unit, hereinafter known as the "cancer research center of Hawaii", to conduct cancer research.  The cancer research center of Hawaii shall be administered by a director to be appointed by the board of regents upon recommendation by the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, and the provost of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, with the concurrence of the president of the university.  The director of the cancer research center of Hawaii shall report to the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, provost of the university of Hawaii at Manoa, and the dean of the school of medicine and coordinate with the president of the university. (b)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds expended from, or originating from the research and training revolving fund, established under section 304A-2253, for the school of medicine or the cancer research center of Hawaii shall be used by the school of medicine or the cancer research center of Hawaii for research and research-related purposes only. (c)  The cancer research center of Hawaii's agenda shall focus on research, education, patient care, and community outreach and should reflect an understanding of the ethnic, cultural, and environmental characteristics of the State and the Pacific region.  The cancer research center of Hawaii may: (1)  Engage in international research collaborations; (2)  Underate research studies and clinical trials; and (3)  Participate in projects and programs of the National Cancer Institute." SECTION 3.  Section 304A-2253, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§304A-2253 Research and training revolving fund.  (a) There is established a [University] university of Hawaii research and training revolving fund into which shall be deposited one hundred per cent of the total amount of indirect overhead revenues generated by the university from research and training programs. The board of regents is authorized to expend one hundred per cent of the revenues deposited in the fund for: (1)  Research and training purposes that may result in additional research and training grants and contracts; (2)  Facilitating research and training at the university; and (3)  Further deposit into the discoveries and inventions special fund. (b)  The annual report required to be made for this revolving fund shall include but not be limited to a breakdown of travel expenses. (c)  Notwithstanding section 304A-107 to the contrary, the board of regents, or its designee, may establish a separate account within the research and training revolving fund for the purpose of providing advance funding to meet reimbursable costs incurred in connection with federally financed research and training projects.  Any reimbursement received as a result of providing advance funding shall be deposited into the research and training revolving fund to be used for the purpose of meeting reimbursable costs incurred in connection with federally financed projects. (d)  Revenues deposited into the fund shall not be used as a basis for reducing any current or future budget request or allotment to the university unless the university requests such a reduction. (e)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds expended from or originating from the fund for the university of Hawaii school of medicine or the cancer research center of Hawaii shall be used by the school of medicine or the cancer research center of Hawaii for research and research-related purposes only." SECTION 4.  Chapter 304A, part IV, subpart R, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________